Vermont, session 2025-2026, S70.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 9 V.S.A. chapter 62 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 62. PROTECTION OF PERSONAL INFORMATION
Subchapter 1. General Provisions
§ 2430. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Authorized agent” means:
VT LEG #380863 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.70
2025 Page 2 of 30
(A) a person designated by a consumer to act on the consumer’s
behalf;
(B) a parent or legal guardian that acts on behalf of the parent’s child
or on behalf of a child for whom the guardian has legal responsibility; or
(C) a guardian or conservator that acts on behalf of a consumer that is
subject to a guardianship, conservatorship, or other protective arrangement.
(2)(A) “Biometric data” means data generated from the technological
processing of an individual’s unique biological, physical, or physiological
characteristics that is linked or reasonably linkable to an individual, including:
(i) iris or retina scans;
(ii) fingerprints;
(iii) facial or hand mapping, geometry, or templates;
(iv) vein patterns;
(v) voice prints; and
(vi) gait or personally identifying physical movement or patterns.
(B) “Biometric data” does not include:
(i) a digital or physical photograph;
(ii) an audio or video recording; or
(iii) any data generated from a digital or physical photograph, or
an audio or video recording, unless such data is generated to identify a specific
individual.
VT LEG #380863 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.70
2025 Page 3 of 30
(3)(A) “Brokered personal information” means one or more of the
following computerized data elements about a consumer, if categorized or
organized for dissemination to third parties:
(i) name;
(ii) address;
(iii) date of birth;
(iv) place of birth;
(v) mother’s maiden name;
(vi) unique biometric data generated from measurements or
technical analysis of human body characteristics used by the owner or licensee
of the data to identify or authenticate the consumer, such as a fingerprint, retina
or iris image, or other unique physical representation or digital representation
of biometric data;
(vii) name or address of a member of the consumer’s immediate
family or household;
(viii) Social Security number or other government-issued
identification number; or
(ix) phone number; or
(x) other information that, alone or in combination with the other
information sold or licensed, would allow a reasonable person to identify the
consumer with reasonable certainty.
VT LEG #380863 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.70
2025 Page 4 of 30
(B) “Brokered personal information” does not include publicly
available information to the extent that it is related to a consumer’s business or
profession.
(2)(4) “Business” means a controller, a consumer health data controller,
a processor, or a commercial entity, including a sole proprietorship,
partnership, corporation, association, limited liability company, or other group,
however organized and whether or not organized to operate at a profit,
including a financial institution organized, chartered, or holding a license or
authorization certificate under the laws of this State, any other state, the United
States, or any other country, or the parent, affiliate, or subsidiary of a financial
institution, but does not include the State, a State agency, any political
subdivision of the State, or a vendor acting solely on behalf of, and at the
direction of, the State.
(3)(5) “Consumer” means an individual residing in this State.
(6) “Consumer health data controller” means any controller that, alone
or jointly with others, determines the purpose and means of processing
consumer health data.
(7) “Controller” means a person who, alone or jointly with others,
determines the purpose and means of processing personal data.
(4)(8)(A) “Data broker” means a business, or unit or units of a business,
separately or together, that knowingly collects and sells or licenses to third
VT LEG #380863 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.70
2025 Page 5 of 30
parties the brokered personal information of a consumer with whom the
business does not have a direct relationship.
(B) Examples of a direct relationship with a business include if the
consumer is a past or present:
(i) customer, client, subscriber, user, or registered user of the
business’s goods or services within the last five calendar years;
(ii) employee, contractor, or agent of the business;
(iii) investor in the business; or
(iv) donor to the business.
(C) The following activities conducted by a business, and the
collection and sale or licensing of brokered personal information incidental to
conducting these activities, do not qualify the business as a data broker:
(i) developing or maintaining third-party e-commerce or
application platforms;
(ii) providing 411 directory assistance or directory information
services, including name, address, and telephone number, on behalf of or as a
function of a telecommunications carrier;
(iii) providing publicly available information related to a
consumer’s business or profession; or
(iv) providing publicly available information via real-time or near-
real-time alert services for health or safety purposes.
VT LEG #380863 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.70
2025 Page 6 of 30
(D) The phrase “sells or licenses” does not include:
(i) a one-time or occasional sale of assets of a business as part of a
transfer of control of those assets that is not part of the ordinary conduct of the
business; or
(ii) a sale or license of data that is merely incidental to the
business.
(5)(9)(A) “Data broker security breach” means an unauthorized
acquisition or a reasonable belief of an unauthorized acquisition of more than
one element of brokered personal information maintained by a data broker
when the brokered personal information is not encrypted, redacted, or
protected by another method that renders the information unreadable or
unusable by an unauthorized person.
(B) “Data broker security breach” does not include good faith but
unauthorized acquisition of brokered personal information by an employee or
agent of the data broker for a legitimate purpose of the data broker, provided
that the brokered personal information is not used for a purpose unrelated to
the data broker’s business or subject to further unauthorized disclosure.
(C) In determining whether brokered personal information has been
acquired or is reasonably believed to have been acquired by a person without
valid authorization, a data broker may consider the following factors, among
others:
VT LEG #380863 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.70
2025 Page 7 of 30
(i) indications that the brokered personal information is in the
physical possession and control of a person without valid authorization, such
as a lost or stolen computer or other device containing brokered personal
information;
(ii) indications that the brokered personal information has been
downloaded or copied;
(iii) indications that the brokered personal information was used
by an unauthorized person, such as fraudulent accounts opened or instances of
identity theft reported; or
(iv) that the brokered personal information has been made public.
(6)(10) “Data collector” means a person who, for any purpose, whether
by automated collection or otherwise, handles, collects, disseminates, or
otherwise deals with personally identifiable information, and includes the
State, State agencies, political subdivisions of the State, public and private
universities, privately and publicly held corporations, limited liability
companies, financial institutions, and retail operators.
(7)(11) “Encryption” means use of an algorithmic process to transform
data into a form in which the data is rendered unreadable or unusable without
use of a confidential process or key.
(8)(12) “License” means a grant of access to, or distribution of, data by
one person to another in exchange for consideration. A use of data for the sole
VT LEG #380863 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.70
2025 Page 8 of 30
benefit of the data provider, where the data provider maintains control over the
use of the data, is not a license.
(9)(13) “Login credentials” means a consumer’s user name or e-mail
email address, in combination with a password or an answer to a security
question, that together permit access to an online account.
(10)(14)(A) “Personally identifiable information” means a consumer’s
first name or first initial and last name in combination with one or more of the
following digital data elements, when the data elements are not encrypted,
redacted, or protected by another method that renders them unreadable or
unusable by unauthorized persons:
(i) a Social Security number;
(ii) a driver license or nondriver State identification card number,
individual taxpayer identification number, passport number, military
identification card number, or other identification number that originates from
a government identification document that is commonly used to verify identity
for a commercial transaction;
(iii) a financial account number or credit or debit card number, if
the number could be used without additional identifying information, access
codes, or passwords;
(iv) a password, personal identification number, or other access
code for a financial account;
VT LEG #380863 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.70
2025 Page 9 of 30
(v) unique biometric data generated from measurements or
technical analysis of human body characteristics used by the owner or licensee
of the data to identify or authenticate the consumer, such as a fingerprint, retina
or iris image, or other unique physical representation or digital representation
of biometric data;
(vi) genetic information; and
(vii)(I) health records or records of a wellness program or similar
program of health promotion or disease prevention;
(II) a health care professional’s medical diagnosis or treatment
of the consumer; or
(III) a health insurance policy number.
(B) “Personally identifiable information” does not mean publicly
available information that is lawfully made available to the general public from
federal, State, or local government records.
(15) “Precise geolocation” means information derived from technology
that can precisely and accurately identify the specific location of a consumer
within a radius of 1,850 feet.
(16) “Processor” means a person who processes personal data on behalf
of a controller.
VT LEG #380863 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.70
2025 Page 10 of 30
(11)(17) “Record” means any material on which written, drawn, spoken,
visual, or electromagnetic information is recorded or preserved, regardless of
physical form or characteristics.
(12)(18) “Redaction” means the rendering of data so that the data are
unreadable or are truncated so that no not more than the last four digits of the
identification number are accessible as part of the data.
(13)(19)(A) “Security breach” means unauthorized acquisition of
electronic data, or a reasonable belief of an unauthorized acquisition of
electronic data, that compromises the security, confidentiality, or integrity of a
consumer’s personally identifiable information or login credentials maintained
by a data collector.
(B) “Security breach” does not include good faith but unauthorized
acquisition of personally identifiable information or login credentials by an
employee or agent of the data collector for a legitimate purpose of the data
collector, provided that the personally identifiable information or login
credentials are not used for a purpose unrelated to the data collector’s business
or subject to further unauthorized disclosure.
(C) In determining whether personally identifiable information or
login credentials have been acquired or is reasonably believed to have been
acquired by a person without valid authorization, a data collector may consider
the following factors, among others:
VT LEG #380863 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.70
2025 Page 11 of 30
(i) indications that the information is in the physical possession
and control of a person without valid authorization, such as a lost or stolen
computer or other device containing information;
(ii) indications that the information has been downloaded or
copied;
(iii) indications that the information was used by an unauthorized
person, such as fraudulent accounts opened or instances of identity theft
reported; or
(iv) that the information has been made public.
* * *
Subchapter 2. Security Breach Notice Act Breaches
§ 2435. NOTICE OF SECURITY BREACHES
* * *
(h) Enforcement.
(1) With respect to all data collectors and other entities subject to this
subchapter, other than a person or entity licensed or registered with the
Department of Financial Regulation under Title 8 or this title, the Attorney
General and State’s Attorney shall have sole and full authority to investigate
potential violations of this subchapter and to enforce, prosecute, obtain, and
impose remedies for a violation of this subchapter or any rules or regulations
made pursuant to this subchapter as the Attorney General and State’s Attorney
VT LEG #380863 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.70
2025 Page 12 of 30
have under chapter 63 of this title. With respect to a controller or processor
other than a controller or processor licensed or registered with the Department
of Financial Regulation under Title 8 or this title, the Attorney General has the
same authority to adopt rules to implement the provisions of this section and to
conduct civil investigations, enter into assurances of discontinuance, bring civil
actions, and take other enforcement actions as provided under chapter 63,
subchapter 1 of this title. The Attorney General may refer the matter to the
State’s Attorney in an appropriate case. The Superior Courts shall have
jurisdiction over any enforcement matter brought by the Attorney General or a
State’s Attorney under this subsection.
(2) With respect to a data collector that is a person or entity licensed or
registered with the Department of Financial Regulation under Title 8 or this
title, the Department of Financial Regulation shall have the full authority to
investigate potential violations of this subchapter and to prosecute, obtain, and
impose remedies for a violation of this subchapter or any rules or regulations
adopted pursuant to this subchapter, as the Department has under Title 8 or this
title or any other applicable law or regulation. With respect to a controller or
processor that is licensed or registered with the Department of Financial
Regulation under Title 8 or this title, the Department of Financial Regulation
has the same authority to adopt rules to implement the provisions of this
section and to conduct civil investigations, enter into assurances of
VT LEG #380863 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.70
2025 Page 13 of 30
discontinuance, bring civil actions, and take other enforcement actions as
provided under Title 8 or this title or any other applicable law or regulation.
* * *
§ 2436. NOTICE OF DATA BROKER SECURITY BREACHES
(a) Short title. This section shall be known as the “Data Broker Security
Breach Notice Act.”
(b) Notice of breach to consumers.
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of this section, a data
broker shall, following discovery or notification to the data broker of a security
breach affecting a consumer, notify the consumer that there has been a data
broker security breach. Notice of the security breach shall be made in the most
expedient time possible and without unreasonable delay, but not later than 45
days after the discovery or notification, consistent with the legitimate needs of
the law enforcement agency, as provided in subdivisions (3) and (4) of this
subsection, or with any measures necessary to determine the scope of the
security breach and restore the reasonable integrity, security, and
confidentiality of the data system.
(2) A data broker shall provide notice of a breach to the Attorney
General as follows:
(A)(i) The data broker shall notify the Attorney General of the date of
the security breach and the date of discovery of the breach and shall provide a
VT LEG #380863 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.70
2025 Page 14 of 30
preliminary description of the breach within 14 business days, consistent with
the legitimate needs of the law enforcement agency, as provided in
subdivisions (3) and (4) of this subsection (b), after the data broker’s discovery
of the security breach.
(ii) If the date of the breach is unknown at the time notice is sent
to the Attorney General, the data broker shall send the Attorney General the
date of the breach as soon as it is known.
(iii) Unless otherwise ordered by a court of this State for good
cause shown, a notice provided under this subdivision (2)(A) shall not be
disclosed, without the consent of the data broker, to any person other than the
authorized agent or representative of the Attorney General, a State’s Attorney,
or another law enforcement officer engaged in legitimate law enforcement
activities.
(B)(i) When the data broker provides notice of the breach pursuant to
subdivision (1) of this subsection, the data broker shall notify the Attorney
General of the number of Vermont consumers affected, if known to the data
broker, and shall provide a copy of the notice provided to consumers under
subdivision (1) of this subsection (b).
(ii) The data broker may send to the Attorney General a second
copy of the consumer notice, from which is redacted the type of brokered
VT LEG #380863 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.70
2025 Page 15 of 30
personal information that was subject to the breach, that the Attorney General
shall use for any public disclosure of the breach.
(3) The notice to the Attorney General and a consumer required by this
subsection shall be delayed upon request of a law enforcement agency. A law
enforcement agency may request the delay if it believes that notification may
impede a law enforcement investigation or a national or Homeland Security
investigation or jeopardize public safety or national or Homeland Security
interests. In the event law enforcement makes the request for a delay in a
manner other than in writing, the data broker shall document the request
contemporaneously in writing and include the name of the law enforcement
officer making the request and the officer’s law enforcement agency engaged
in the investigation. A law enforcement agency shall promptly notify the data
broker in writing when the law enforcement agency no longer believes that
notification may impede a law enforcement investigation or a national or
Homeland Security investigation or jeopardize public safety or national or
Homeland Security interests. The data broker shall provide notice required by
this subsection without unreasonable delay upon receipt of a written
communication, which includes facsimile or electronic communication, from
the law enforcement agency withdrawing its request for delay.
(4) The notice to a consumer required in subdivision (1) of this
subsection shall be clear and conspicuous. A notice to a consumer of a
VT LEG #380863 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.70
2025 Page 16 of 30
security breach involving brokered personal information shall include a
description of each of the following, if known to the data broker:
(A) the incident in general terms;
(B) the categories of brokered personal information that was subject
to the security breach;
(C) the general acts of the data broker to protect the brokered
personal information from further security breach;
(D) a telephone number, toll-free if available, that the consumer may
call for further information and assistance;
(E) advice that directs the consumer to remain vigilant by reviewing
account statements and monitoring free credit reports; and
(F) the approximate date of the data broker security breach.
(5) A data broker may provide notice of a security breach involving
brokered personal information to a consumer by two or more of the following
methods:
(A) written notice mailed to the consumer’s residence;
(B) electronic notice, for those consumers for whom the data broker
has a valid email address, if:
(i) the data broker’s primary method of communication with the
consumer is by electronic means, the electronic notice does not request or
contain a hypertext link to a request that the consumer provide personal
VT LEG #380863 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.70
2025 Page 17 of 30
information, and the electronic notice conspicuously warns consumers not to
provide personal information in response to electronic communications
regarding security breaches; or
(ii) the notice is consistent with the provisions regarding electronic
records and signatures for notices in 15 U.S.C. § 7001;
(C) telephonic notice, provided that telephonic contact is made
directly with each affected consumer and not through a prerecorded message;
or
(D) notice by publication in a newspaper of statewide circulation in
the event the data broker cannot effectuate notice by any other means.
(c) Exception.
(1) Notice of a security breach pursuant to subsection (b) of this section
is not required if the data broker establishes that misuse of brokered personal
information is not reasonably possible and the data broker provides notice of
the determination that the misuse of the brokered personal information is not
reasonably possible pursuant to the requirements of this subsection. If the data
broker establishes that misuse of the brokered personal information is not
reasonably possible, the data broker shall provide notice of its determination
that misuse of the brokered personal information is not reasonably possible and
a detailed explanation for said determination to the Attorney General. The data
broker may designate its notice and detailed explanation to the Attorney
VT LEG #380863 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.70
2025 Page 18 of 30
General as a trade secret if the notice and detailed explanation meet the
definition of trade secret contained in 1 V.S.A. § 317(c)(9).
(2) If a data broker established that misuse of brokered personal
information was not reasonably possible under subdivision (1) of this
subsection and subsequently obtains facts indicating that misuse of the
brokered personal information has occurred or is occurring, the data broker
shall provide notice of the security breach pursuant to subsection (b) of this
section.
(d) Waiver. Any waiver of the provisions of this subchapter is contrary to
public policy and is void and unenforceable.
(e) Enforcement.
(1) With respect to a controller or processor other than a controller or
processor licensed or registered with the Department of Financial Regulation
under Title 8 or this title, the Attorney General has the same authority to adopt
rules to implement the provisions of this section and to conduct civil
investigations, enter into assurances of discontinuance, bring civil actions, and
take other enforcement actions as provided under chapter 63, subchapter 1 of
this title. The Attorney General may refer the matter to the State’s Attorney in
an appropriate case. The Superior Courts shall have jurisdiction over any
enforcement matter brought by the Attorney General or a State’s Attorney
under this subsection.
VT LEG #380863 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.70
2025 Page 19 of 30
(2) With respect to a controller or processor that is licensed or registered
with the Department of Financial Regulation under Title 8 or this title, the
Department of Financial Regulation has the same authority to adopt rules to
implement the provisions of this section and to conduct civil investigations,
enter into assurances of discontinuance, bring civil actions, and take other
enforcement actions as provided under Title 8 or this title or any other
applicable law or regulation.
* * *
Subchapter 5. Data Brokers
§ 2446. DATA BROKERS; ANNUAL REGISTRATION
(a) Registration. Annually, on or before January 31 following a year in
which a person meets the definition of data broker as provided in section 2430
of this title, a data broker shall:
(1) register with the Secretary of State;
(2) pay a registration fee of $100.00; and pay a registration fee in an
amount determined by the Secretary of State which shall:
(A) not exceed the reasonable costs of:
(i) establishing and maintaining the informational website set forth
in subsection (d) of this section; and
(ii) establishing, maintaining, and providing access to the
accessible deletion mechanism set forth in section 2446a of this title; and
VT LEG #380863 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.70
2025 Page 20 of 30
(B) be deposited by the Secretary of State into the Data Brokers
Registry Fund established in section 2446b of this title; and
(3) provide the following information to the Secretary of State:
(A) the name and primary physical, e-mail email, phone number, and
Internet internet addresses of the data broker;
(B) if the data broker permits a consumer to opt out of the data
broker’s collection of brokered personal information, opt out of its databases,
or opt out of certain sales of data:
(i) the method for requesting an opt-out;
(ii) if the opt-out applies to only certain activities or sales, which
ones; and
(iii) whether the data broker permits a consumer to authorize a
third party an authorized agent to perform the opt-out on the consumer’s
behalf;
(C) a statement specifying the data collection, databases, or sales
activities from which a consumer may not opt out;
(D) a statement whether the data broker implements a purchaser
credentialing process;
(E) the number of data broker security breaches that the data broker
has experienced during the prior year, and if known, the total number of
consumers affected by the breaches;
VT LEG #380863 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.70
2025 Page 21 of 30
(F) where the data broker has actual knowledge that it possesses the
brokered personal information of minors, a separate statement detailing the
data collection practices, databases, sales activities, and opt-out policies that
are applicable to the brokered personal information of minors; and
(G) whether the data broker collects:
(i) precise geolocation of consumers;
(ii) reproductive health care data of consumers;
(iii) Social Security numbers of consumers;
(iv) driver’s license information of consumers;
(v) biometric data of consumers;
(vi) immigration status of consumers;
(vii) sexual orientation of consumers; or
(viii) union membership status of consumers;
(H) beginning on January 1, 2031, whether the data broker has
undergone an audit pursuant to subsection 2446a(d) of this title and if so, the
most recent year that the data broker has submitted a report resulting from the
audit to the Secretary of State;
(I) beginning on January 1, 2029, the following annual metrics
pursuant to section 2446a of this title:
(i) the number of deletion requests received;
(ii) the number of deletion requests processed;
VT LEG #380863 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.70
2025 Page 22 of 30
(iii) the number of deletion requests denied because the consumer
request cannot be verified; and
(iv) the number of deletion requests denied because retention of
the consumer’s brokered personal information is required by law; and
(J) any additional information or explanation the data broker chooses
to provide concerning its data collection practices.
(b) Penalties. A data broker that fails to register pursuant to subsection (a)
of this section is liable to the State for:
(1) a civil penalty of $50.00 for each day, not to exceed a total of
$10,000.00 for each year, it fails to register pursuant to this section;
(2) an amount equal to the fees due under this section during the period
it failed to register pursuant to this section; and
(3) other penalties imposed by law.
(1) A data broker that fails to register as required by subsection (a) of
this section is liable to the State for:
(A) an administrative fine of $200.00 for each day the data broker
fails to register;
(B) an amount equal to the fees that were due during the period the
data broker failed to register; and
(C) any reasonable costs incurred by the State in the investigation
and administration of the action as the court deems appropriate.
VT LEG #380863 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.70
2025 Page 23 of 30
(2) A data broker that fails to provide all registration information
required in subdivision (a)(3) of this section shall file an amendment that
includes any omitted information not later than 30 days after receiving
notification of the omission from the Secretary of State and is liable to the
State for a civil penalty of $1,000.00 per day for each day thereafter that the
data broker does not file an amendment providing the omitted information.
(3) A data broker that files materially incorrect information in its
registration:
(A) is liable to the State for a civil penalty of $25,000.00; and
(B) shall correct the incorrect information not later than 30 days after
notification of the incorrect information, and, if it fails to correct the
information, the data broker shall be liable for an additional civil penalty of
$1,000.00 per day for each day the data broker fails to correct the information.
(4) All penalties, fines, fees, and expenses recovered in an action
pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Data Brokers Registry Fund.
(c) Enforcement. The Attorney General and the Secretary of State may
maintain an action in the Civil Division of the Superior Court to collect the
penalties imposed in this section and to seek appropriate injunctive relief.
(d) Public web page. The Secretary of State shall create a publicly
accessible page on its website where it lists the registration information
VT LEG #380863 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.70
2025 Page 24 of 30
provided by data brokers pursuant to this section and the accessible deletion
mechanism set forth in section 2446a of this title.
§ 2446a. ACCESSIBLE DELETION MECHANISM
(a) Creation of mechanism. On or before January 1, 2028, the Secretary of
State shall establish an accessible deletion mechanism that:
(1) implements and maintains reasonable security procedures and
practices, including administrative, physical, and technical safeguards
appropriate to the nature of the information and the purposes for which the
brokered personal information will be used and to protect a consumer’s
brokered personal information from unauthorized use, disclosure, access,
destruction, or modification;
(2) allows a consumer, through a single verifiable consumer request, to
request that every data broker that maintains any brokered personal
information about the consumer delete the brokered personal information;
(3) allows a consumer to selectively exclude specific data brokers from
a request made under subdivision (2) of this subsection;
(4) allows a consumer to alter a previous request made pursuant to
subdivision (2) of this subsection after at least 45 days have passed since the
consumer last made a request;
VT LEG #380863 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.70
2025 Page 25 of 30
(5) allows a consumer to request the deletion of all brokered personal
information related to that consumer all at once through a single deletion
request;
(6) permits a consumer to securely submit information in one or more
privacy-protecting ways, as determined by the Secretary of State, to aid in the
deletion request;
(7) allows a data broker registered with the Secretary of State to
determine whether a consumer has submitted a verifiable request to delete the
brokered personal information related to that consumer as described in
subdivision (2) of this subsection;
(8) does not allow the disclosure of any additional brokered personal
information of a consumer when the data broker accesses the accessible
deletion mechanism, unless otherwise specified in this subchapter;
(9) allows a consumer to make a request described in subdivision (2) of
this subsection using a website operated by the Secretary of State;
(10) does not charge a consumer to make a request described in
subdivision (2) of this subsection;
(11) is readily accessible and usable by consumers with disabilities;
(12) supports the ability of a consumer’s authorized agents to aid in the
deletion request;
VT LEG #380863 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.70
2025 Page 26 of 30
(13) allows the consumer or their authorized agent to verify the status of
the consumer’s deletion request; and
(14) provides a description of the following:
(A) the deletion permitted by this section;
(B) the process for submitting a deletion request pursuant to this
section; and
(C) examples of the types of information that may be deleted.
(b) Data broker access.
(1) Beginning on August 1, 2028, a data broker shall access the
accessible deletion mechanism established in subsection (a) of this section at
least once every 45 days and shall:
(A) process all verifiable deletion requests the data broker has
received from consumers in the previous 45 days and delete such brokered
personal information;
(B) process a request as an opt-out of the sale or sharing of the
consumer’s brokered personal information;
(C) direct all service providers and contractors associated with the
data broker to:
(i) delete all brokered personal information related to a consumer
who has made a verifiable deletion request; and
VT LEG #380863 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.70
2025 Page 27 of 30
(ii) process a request as an opt-out of the sale or sharing of the
consumer’s brokered personal information; and
(D) not use or disclose any information submitted by a consumer
through the accessible deletion mechanism for any other purpose besides the
authority provided in this subsection (b), including for marketing purposes.
(2) A data broker may deny a consumer’s request to delete a consumer’s
brokered personal information made pursuant to this section if retention of the
consumer’s brokered personal information is required by law.
(3) The Secretary of State may charge an access fee to a data broker to
use the accessible deletion mechanism that does not exceed the reasonable
costs of providing access.
(4) Any fees collected pursuant to subdivision (3) of this subsection
shall be deposited into the Data Brokers Registry Fund.
(c) Continuing obligation to consumers. Beginning on August 1, 2028,
once a data broker has processed a verifiable consumer request to delete a
consumer’s brokered personal information, the data broker shall:
(1) delete all brokered personal information of the consumer at least
once every 45 days unless:
(A) the consumer alters the consumer’s decision pursuant to
subdivision (a)(4) of this section; or
VT LEG #380863 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.70
2025 Page 28 of 30
(B) retention of the consumer’s brokered personal information is
required by law; and
(2) not sell or share new brokered personal information of the consumer
unless the consumer expressly requests otherwise in writing;
(d) Audits.
(1) A data broker shall undergo an audit by an independent third party to
determine compliance with this section at least once every three years, with the
first audit taking place on or before December 31, 2030.
(2) For an audit completed pursuant to subdivision (1) of this
subsection, the data broker shall submit the report resulting from the audit and
any related materials to the Secretary of State within five business days of a
written request from the Secretary of State.
(3) A data broker shall maintain all reports and materials resulting from
audits conducted pursuant to this subsection for at least six years.
(e) Rules. The Secretary of State may adopt rules to implement the
provisions of this subchapter, except it shall not be permitted to create a rule
that establishes a new fee that is not authorized in this section.
(f) Penalties.
(1) A data broker that fails to comply with the requirements of this
section is liable to the State for:
VT LEG #380863 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.70
2025 Page 29 of 30
(A) an administrative fine of $200.00 per day for each deletion
request the data broker fails to complete as required by subsection (b) of this
section; and
(B) reasonable expenses incurred by the State in the investigation and
administration of the action.
(2) All penalties, fines, fees, and expenses recovered in an action
pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection shall be deposited in the Data
Brokers Registry Fund.
§ 2446b. DATA BROKERS REGISTRY FUND
There is established the Data Brokers Registry Fund within the State
Treasury. The Fund shall be administered by the Secretary of State. All
monies collected or received by the Secretary of State and the Attorney
General pursuant to this subchapter shall be deposited into the Fund and shall
be made available for expenditure by the Secretary of State upon appropriation
by the General Assembly to offset the following costs:
(1) the reasonable costs of establishing and maintaining the
informational website as set forth in subsection 2446(d) of this title;
(2) the costs incurred by State courts and the Secretary of State in
connection with enforcing this subchapter; and
VT LEG #380863 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.70
2025 Page 30 of 30
(3) the reasonable costs of establishing, maintaining, and providing
access to the accessible deletion mechanism described in section 2446a of this
title.
§ 2446c. CREDENTIALING
(a) A data broker shall maintain reasonable procedures designed to ensure
that the brokered personal information it discloses is used for a legitimate and
legal purpose.
(b) These procedures shall require that prospective users of the brokered
information identify themselves, certify the purposes for which the information
is sought, and certify that the information shall be used for no other purpose.
(c) A data broker shall make a reasonable effort to verify the identity of a
new prospective user and the uses certified by the prospective user prior to
furnishing the user brokered personal information.
(d) A data broker shall not furnish brokered personal information to any
person if it has reasonable grounds for believing that the brokered personal
information will not be used for a legitimate and legal purpose.
§ 2447. DATA BROKER DUTY TO PROTECT INFORMATION;
STANDARDS; TECHNICAL REQUIREMENTS
* * *
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380863 v.1